Washington statutes.
RCW 17.06.020

Intercounty weed districts authorized.

An intercounty weed district, including all or any part of two counties or more, may be created for the purposes set forth in RCW 17.04.010 by the joint action of the boards of county commissioners of the counties in which any portion of the proposed district is located.

[ 1959 c 205 s 2.]